Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1615
Retail marketer, defined.

Retail marketer means any person with bulk propane storage engaged in the sale of odorized propane to the ultimate consumer or to retail propane dispensers within Nebraska.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 15.